Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.65.020

Publication of legal notice.

The publication of a legal notice required by general law or by a code city ordinance shall be in a newspaper of general circulation within the city having the qualifications prescribed by chapter 65.16 RCW and shall be governed by the provisions thereof as the same relate to a city of any class.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.65.020.]